Maryland, session 2026, HB1487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 59. BALTIMORE CITY MOBILE INFANT AND MATERNAL HEALTH PILOT
PROGRAM.
13–5901.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1487*

HOUSE BILL 1487
(B) “MOBILE HEALTH UNIT” MEANS A MOTOR VEHICLE EQUIPPED TO
DELIVER HEALTH SERVICES, INCLUDING PRIMARY CARE, SCREENINGS, AND
PREVENTIVE SERVICES, DIRECTLY TO UNDERSERVED OR VULNERABLE
COMMUNITIES.
(C) “MOMMOBILE” MEANS THE BALTIMORE CITY MOBILE INFANT AND
MATERNAL HEALTH PILOT PROGRAM.
13–5902.
THERE IS A BALTIMORE CITY MOBILE INFANT AND MATERNAL HEALTH
PILOT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
13–5903.
THE PURPOSE OF MOMMOBILE IS TO USE MOBILE HEALTH UNITS TO BRING
POSTPARTUM CARE DIRECTLY TO BALTIMORE NEIGHBORHOODS TO:
(1) DELIVER POSTPARTUM CHECKUPS, MENTAL HEALTH
SCREENINGS, AND CARE COORDINATION;
(2) ALLOW HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS, INCLUDING MIDWIVES AND
DOULAS, TO PROVIDE CULTURALLY COMPETENT CARE;
(3) REDUCE TRANSPORTATION BARRIERS AND IMPROVE
POSTPARTUM VISIT ATTENDANCE;
(4) IMPROVE THE IDENTIFICATION OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH RISKS
AND SUPPORT REFERRALS TO SOCIAL SERVICES AND COMMUNITY PROGRAMS IN
BALTIMORE CITY; AND
(5) IDENTIFY KEY METRICS THAT CAN BE USED TO ASSESS MATERNAL
HEALTH OUTCOMES.
13–5904.
THE SECRETARY, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE BALTIMORE CITY HEALTH
DEPARTMENT, SHALL DETERMINE THE FOLLOWING FOR MOMMOBILE:
(1) THE TIME FRAME AND STEPS NECESSARY TO ESTABLISH
MOMMOBILE;

HOUSE BILL 1487 3
(2) THE NEIGHBORHOODS OF BALTIMORE CITY IN WHICH
MOMMOBILE WILL OPERATE;
(3) FUNDING SUPPORT FOR MOMMOBILE, INCLUDING
ESTABLISHING PARTNERSHIPS TO USE EXISTING MOBILE HEALTH UNITS IN
BALTIMORE CITY;
(4) THE RESOURCES NECESSARY TO SUPPORT MOMMOBILE;
(5) SERVICES THAT WILL BE OFFERED THROUGH MOMMOBILE;
(6) A PLAN TO STAFF THE MOBILE HEALTH UNITS WITH APPROPRIATE
HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS FOR THE SERVICES IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (5) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(7) A PLAN TO EVALUATE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF MOMMOBILE,
INCLUDING FEEDBACK FROM HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS AND PATIENTS.
13–5905.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
SECRETARY SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE
AND THE HOUSE HEALTH COMMITTEE, ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF MOMMOBILE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.